Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-529
Unlawful transportation; conviction; sale of vehicle.

The court, upon conviction of the person so arrested, unless good cause to the contrary is shown by the owner or lienor, shall order a sale by public auction of the vehicle seized or the vehicle may be put to official use by the confiscating agency for a period of not more than two years. The officer making the sale, after deducting the expenses of keeping the vehicle, the fee for the seizure, and the cost of sale, shall pay all liens, according to their priorities, which are established, by intervention or otherwise at such hearing or in other proceedings brought for such purpose, as being bona fide and having been created without the lienor having any notice that the carrying vehicle was being used or was to be used for illegal transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel and shall pay the balance of the proceeds into the temporary school fund to be used for the support of the common schools as in the case of fines and forfeitures. Notice of the hearing upon the proceedings for the forfeiture and confiscation of such vehicle shall be given all interested parties by publication in one issue of a legal newspaper published in the county or, if such newspaper is not published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county at least ten days prior to the date of hearing.

Laws 1933, c. 47, § 2, p. 259;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-423;

R.S.1943, § 66-436;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-436;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 66-4,110;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 91;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 3.